District of Columbia statutes.
22-2709

Detaining an individual in disorderly house for debt there contracted.

Any person or persons who attempt to detain any individual in a disorderly house or house of prostitution because of any debt or debts such individual has contracted, or is said to have contracted, while living in said house of prostitution or disorderly house shall be guilty of a felony, and on conviction thereof be imprisoned for a term not less than one year nor more than 5 years. In addition to any other penalty provided under this section, a person may be fined an amount not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

June 25, 1910, 36 Stat. 833, ch. 404, § 5
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119,§ 12(e), 41 DCR 1639
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-275, § 6, 44 DCR 1408
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 306(b), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 22-2709.
1973 Ed., § 22-2709.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added the last sentence.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 306(b) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.